Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Chapter 1. Appointment, General Powers, and Duties
§ 20.
Particular proceedings and activities; personnel.

The Commission or the Department of Public Service may authorize or retain legal counsel, official stenographers, expert witnesses, advisors, temporary employees, and other research, scientific, or engineering services:
(a) (1) The Commission or the Department of Public Service may authorize or retain legal counsel, official stenographers, expert witnesses, advisors, temporary employees, and other research, scientific, or engineering services:

To assist the Commission or Department in any proceeding listed in subsection (b) of this section.

To monitor compliance with any formal opinion or order of the Commission.

In proceedings under section 248 of this title, to assist other State agencies that are named parties to the proceeding where the Commission or Department determines that they are essential to a full consideration of the petition, or for the purpose of monitoring compliance with an order resulting from such a petition.

In addition to the services in subdivisions (1)(A)-(C) of this subsection (a), in proceedings under subsection 248(h) of this title, by contract with the regional planning commission of the region or regions affected by a proposed facility, to assist in determining conformance with local and regional plans and to obtain the commission’s data, analysis, and recommendations on the economic, environmental, historic, or other impact of the proposed facility in the region.

To assist in monitoring the ongoing and future reliability and the postclosure activities of any nuclear generating plant within the State. In this section, “postclosure activities” includes planning for and implementation of any action within the State’s jurisdiction that shall or will occur when the plant permanently ceases generating electricity.

The Agency of Natural Resources may authorize or retain legal counsel, official stenographers, expert witnesses, advisors, temporary employees, and other research, scientific, or engineering services to:

Assist the Agency of Natural Resources in any proceeding under section 248 of this title.

Monitor compliance with an order issued under section 248 of this title.

Assist the Commission or the Department of Public Service in any proceedings described in subdivisions (b)(9)(Federal Energy Regulatory Commission) and (11)(Nuclear Regulatory Commission) of this section. Allocation of Agency of Natural Resources costs under this subdivision (C) shall be in the same manner as provided under subdivisions (b)(9) and (11) of this section. The Agency of Natural Resources shall report annually to the Joint Fiscal Committee all costs incurred and expenditures charged under the authority of this subsection (a) with respect to proceedings under subdivision (b)(9) of this section and the purpose for which such costs were incurred and expenditures made.

Assist in monitoring the postclosure activities of any nuclear generating plant within the State.

The Department of Health may authorize or retain legal counsel, official stenographers, expert witnesses, advisors, temporary employees, and other research, scientific, or engineering services to assist in monitoring the postclosure activities of any nuclear generating plant within the State.

The Department of Public Safety, Division of Emergency Management and Homeland Security may authorize or retain legal counsel, official stenographers, expert witnesses, advisors, employees, and other research, scientific, or engineering services, or other planning expenses to assist in monitoring the postclosure activities of any nuclear generating plant within the State.

The Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets may authorize or retain legal counsel, official stenographers, expert witnesses, advisors, temporary employees, and other research, scientific, or engineering services to:

assist the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets in any proceeding under section 248 of this title; or

monitor compliance with an order issued under section 248 of this title.

The personnel authorized by this section shall be in addition to the regular personnel of the Commission or the Department of Public Service or other State agencies; and in the case of the Department of Public Service or other State agencies may be retained only with the approval of the Governor and after notice to the applicant or the company or companies involved. The Commission or the Department of Public Service shall fix the amount of compensation and expenses to be paid such additional personnel, except that the Agency of Natural Resources, the Department of Health, the Department of Public Safety, Division of Emergency Management and Homeland Security, or the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets, respectively, shall fix the amount of compensation and expenses to be paid to additional personnel that it retains under subdivision (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this subsection.

Proceedings, including appeals therefrom, for which additional personnel may be retained are:

Hearings resulting from a utility request to seek an increase in its rates, tolls, or charges, including hearings resulting from complaints against the proposed increase.

Hearings resulting from a petition by a utility or a person operating a utility to issue stock, bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness for which the approval of the Commission is required by law.

Hearings resulting from a petition for a merger, consolidation, or acquisition for which the approval of the Commission is required by law.

Hearings resulting from a petition for a certificate of public good.

Hearings resulting from a petition to acquire property through the exercise of eminent domain under section 110 et seq. of this title.

Hearings resulting from an investigation initiated by the Commission or resulting from a petition brought by the Department.

Proceedings under chapter 13 of this title relating to regulation of cable television systems, provided that due regard shall be taken of a cable television company’s size and gross operating revenues.

Hearings resulting from opinions requested under subsection 248(h) of this title.

Proceedings at the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission which involve Vermont utilities or which may affect the interests of the State of Vermont. Costs under this subdivision shall be charged to the involved electric or natural gas companies pursuant to subsection 21(a) of this title. In cases where the proceeding is generic in nature, the costs shall be allocated to electric or natural gas companies in proportion to the benefits sought for the customers of such companies from such advocacy. The Public Utility Commission and the Department of Public Service shall report quarterly to the Joint Fiscal Committee all costs incurred and expenditures charged under the authority of this subsection, and the purpose for which such costs were incurred and expenditures made.

Proceedings under the federal Telecommunications Act of 1996.

Proceedings at the Nuclear Regulatory Commission which involve Vermont utilities or which may affect the interests of the State of Vermont. Costs under this subdivision shall be charged to the involved electric companies pursuant to subsection 21(a) of this title. In cases where the proceeding is generic in nature, the costs shall be allocated to electric companies in proportion to the benefits sought for the customers of such companies from such advocacy.

Proceedings at the U.S. Bankruptcy Court which involve Vermont utilities or which may affect the interests of the State of Vermont. Costs under this subdivision shall be charged to the involved utilities pursuant to subsection 21(a) of this title. In cases where the proceeding is generic in nature, the costs shall be allocated to utilities in proportion to the benefits sought for the customers of such companies from such advocacy.

Proceedings before the Federal Communications Commission or related forums which involve Vermont utilities or which may affect the interests of the State of Vermont. Costs under this subdivision shall be charged, pursuant to subsection 21(a) of this title, to the companies providing telecommunications services on a common carrier basis. In cases where the proceeding is generic in nature, the costs shall be allocated to companies in proportion to the benefits sought for their customers from such advocacy.

Proceedings before the Federal Communications Commission or related forums which involve a company that owns a cable television system holding a certificate of public good and delivering services in Vermont or which may affect the interests of the State of Vermont. Costs under this subdivision shall be charged to the company pursuant to subsection 21(a) of this title. In cases where the proceeding is generic in nature, the costs shall be allocated to companies in proportion to the benefits sought for their customers from such advocacy.

Proceedings before any State or federal court concerning a company holding or a facility subject to a certificate issued under this title if the proceedings may affect the interests of the State of Vermont. Costs under this subdivision (15) shall be charged to the involved company pursuant to subsection 21(a) of this title. In cases where the proceeding is generic in nature, the costs shall be allocated to companies in proportion to the benefits sought for their customers from such advocacy.

Persons employed by the State are competent to be designated to act for the same purposes and in lieu of or in conjunction with additional personnel retained under this section. However, when so acting, they shall not receive compensation in addition to their regular pay.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 258

, § 1, eff. July 31, 1961;

1975, No. 254

(Adj. Sess.), § 154;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1987, No. 65

, § 7, eff. May 28, 1987;

1987, No. 271

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. June 21, 1988;

1987, No. 273

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. June 21, 1988;

1989, No. 63

, § 1, eff. May 22, 1989;

1995, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. May 22, 1996;

1997, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 49

, § 150;

1999, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 12h;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 47, 48;

2003, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § F25;

2011, No. 47

, § 20n, eff. May 25, 2011;

2015, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § E.233.

§ 21.
Particular proceedings and activities; assessment of costs.

An agency may allocate the portion of the expense incurred or authorized by it in retaining additional personnel pursuant to section 20 of this title to the applicant or the company or companies involved. As used in this section, “agency” means an agency, board, commission, or department of the State enabled to authorize or retain personnel under section 20 of this title.

The Commission shall upon petition of an applicant or company to which costs are proposed to be allocated, review and determine, after opportunity for hearing, having due regard for the size and complexity of the project, the necessity and reasonableness of such costs, and may amend or revise such allocations. Nothing in this section shall confer authority on the Commission to select or decide the personnel, the expenses of whom are being allocated, unless such personnel are retained by the Commission. Prior to allocating costs, the Commission shall make a determination of the purpose and use of the funds to be raised hereunder, identify the recipient of the funds, provide for allocation of costs among companies to be assessed, indicate an estimated duration of the retention of personnel whose costs are being allocated, and estimate the total costs to be imposed. With the approval of the Commission, such estimates may be revised as necessary. From time to time during the progress of the work of such additional personnel, the agency retaining the personnel shall render to the company detailed statements showing the amount of money expended or contracted for in the work of such personnel, which statements shall be paid by the applicant or the company into the State Treasury at such time and in such manner as the agency may reasonably direct.

In any proceeding under section 248 of this title, the Agency of Natural Resources may allocate the portion of the expense incurred in retaining additional staff authorized in subsection (a) of this section only if the following apply:

the Agency of Natural Resources does not have the expertise, and the retention of such expertise is required to fulfill its statutory obligations in the proceeding; and

the Agency of Natural Resources allocates only that portion of the cost for such expertise that exceeds the fee paid by the applicant under section 248b of this title.

When regular employees of an agency are employed in the particular proceedings and activities described in section 20 of this title, the agency may also allocate the portion of its costs and expenses to the applicant or the company or companies involved. The costs of regular employees shall be computed on the basis of working days within the salary period, except that the Department of Public Safety, Division of Emergency Management and Homeland Security may allocate the full cost of the regular employee. The manner of assessment and of making payments shall otherwise be as provided for additional personnel in subsection (a) of this section. However, with respect to proceedings under section 248 of this title, the Agency of Natural Resources shall not allocate the costs of regular employees.

With the approval of the Governor, the Department of Public Service may also allocate such portion of expense incurred by it in administering the purchase of electric energy or power or natural gas from outside the State, to the electric or gas distribution companies, cooperative, municipal or privately owned, to which such energy, power, or gas is sold, in proportion to the purchases thereof to such companies. When regular employees are employed on such work, their cost shall be computed on the basis of working days within the salary period. The manner of assessment and making payments shall otherwise be as provided for additional personnel in subsection (a) of this section.

The Agency of Natural Resources may allocate expenses under this section only for costs in excess of the amount specified in

3 V.S.A. § 2809(d)(1)(A)

.

Annually, on or before January 15, each agency shall report to the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy and the House Committees on Energy and Technology and on Natural Resources, Fish, and Wildlife the total amount of expenses allocated under this section during the previous fiscal year. The report shall include the name of each applicant or company to whom expenses were allocated and the amount allocated to each applicant or company. The Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets also shall submit a copy of its report to the Senate Committee on Agriculture and the House Committee on Agriculture and Forestry.

With the approval of the Governor, the Department of Public Service may allocate the expense incurred under

10 V.S.A. § 7063

in compensating members and alternate members of the Commission among the generators of low-level radioactive waste in the State. Any such allocation shall be in proportion to the volume of waste generated by each such generator.

An agency may allocate such portion of expense incurred or authorized by it in compensating persons retained in the monitoring of postclosure activities of a nuclear generating plant pursuant to subsection 20(a) of this title to the plant whose activities are being monitored. Except for the Commission, the agency shall obtain the approval of the Governor before making such an allocation.

Under subsections (f) and (g) of this section, the manner of assessment and making payments shall be as provided in subsection (a) of this section. A generator or plant to which expense is allocated under subsection (f) or (g) of this section may petition the Commission in accordance with the procedures of subsection (a) of this section.

If an invoice for expenses incurred under subsection (a) of this section is not paid within 45 days after the date of mailing:

the Commission may withhold the issuance of or revoke any related certificate of public good, provided the applicant is given an opportunity for hearing after reasonable notice;

an agency may charge simple interest of one percent per month on the unpaid amount of the invoice for the period from 45 days after the date of mailing to the date of full payment of the amount due; and

an agency may either contract with private collection agencies to collect principal and interest due or use setoff debt collection, as provided in

32 V.S.A. §§ 5931-5940

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1989, No. 63

, § 2, eff. May 22, 1989;

1999, No. 49

, § 151;

1999, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § F26;

2011, No. 47

, § 20o, eff. May 25, 2011;

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. May 14, 2012;

2015, No. 57

, § 17a;

2015, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § E.233.1;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 173a;

2019, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. Oct. 8, 2020.

§ 22.
Tax to finance Department and Commission.

For the purpose of maintaining the Department of Public Service and Public Utility Commission, including expenses related to maintaining an adequate engineering, legal, and administrative force in the Department of Public Service and paying all the expenses incident thereof, including rents, each person, partnership, association, or private or municipal corporation conducting a business subject to the supervision of the Department of Public Service and Public Utility Commission, including electric cooperatives, shall pay into the State Treasury on or before April 15 annually, in addition to the taxes now required by law to be paid, a tax, at the rate hereinafter named, according to the nature of the public service business engaged in by such person, partnership, association, or private or municipal corporation, based on the gross operating revenue received by such person, partnership, association, or private or municipal corporation in the conduct of such business in the State during the year next preceding, as shown by the annual report filed on or before such date with the Department of Public Service on the form prescribed by it and containing such information as may be necessary to enable the Department to determine the amount of the tax payable.

The rate of tax for each type of public service company, for the purpose of maintaining the Department of Public Service, shall be the following:

for companies, cooperative, municipal or privately owned, generating, distributing, selling, or transmitting electric energy, 0.00320 of gross operating revenue;

for telephone companies, 0.003 of gross operating revenue or $300.00, whichever is greater;

for gas companies, 0.00320 of gross operating revenue;

for water companies, 0.0006 of gross operating revenue or $3.00, whichever is greater;

for companies owning or operating a cable television system, 0.003 of gross operating revenue or $15.00, whichever is greater, $25,000.00 of which shall be used each year by the Department for special planning functions relating to cable television systems;

for companies whose sole telephone business consists of owning customer-owned, coin-operated telephones with total annual revenues of less than $5,000.00, the choice of either 0.003 of gross operating revenue from telephone revenues or the amount of $12.00; and

for all other companies named in section 203 of this title, 0.0006 of gross operating revenues.

The rate of tax for each type of public service company, for the purpose of maintaining the Public Utility Commission, shall be the following:

for companies, cooperative, municipal or privately owned, generating, distributing, selling, or transmitting electric energy, 0.00205 of gross operating revenue;

for telephone companies, 0.002 of gross operating revenue or $200.00, whichever is greater;

for gas companies, 0.00205 of gross operating revenue;

for water companies, 0.0004 of gross operating revenue or $2.00, whichever is greater;

for companies owning or operating a cable television system, 0.002 of gross operating revenue or $10.00, whichever is greater;

for companies whose sole telephone business consists of owning customer-owned, coin-operated telephones with total annual revenues of less than $5,000.00, the choice of either 0.002 of gross operating revenue from telephone revenues or the amount of $8.00; and

for all other companies named in section 203 of this title, 0.0004 of gross operating revenues.

The taxes levied under this section shall not apply to sales of electrical power for resale.

[Repealed.]

On June 30 of each year, any balance in the amount received by the Public Utility Commission from the special fund for the maintenance of engineering and accounting forces, after accounting for expenditures and encumbrances, in excess of 20 percent of the funds received by the Commission for that year shall be used in the manner provided by subdivision (3) of this subsection.
(d) (1) On June 30 of each year, any balance in the amount received by the Public Utility Commission from the special fund for the maintenance of engineering and accounting forces, after accounting for expenditures and encumbrances, in excess of 20 percent of the funds received by the Commission for that year shall be used in the manner provided by subdivision (3) of this subsection.

On June 30 of each year, any balance in the amount received by the Department of Public Service from the special fund for the maintenance of engineering and accounting forces, after accounting for expenditures and encumbrances, in excess of 20 percent of the funds received by the Department for that year shall be used in the manner provided by subdivision (3) of this subsection.

The excess balances determined under subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection shall be used in the next succeeding year to directly reduce the rates otherwise collected from the ratepayers of this State for the costs of the telephone Lifeline program authorized by subsection 218(c) of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 258

, § 2, eff. July 31, 1961;

1973, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1985, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1985, No. 224

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1987, No. 272

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 254

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1991, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1995, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

1995, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 24a, eff. July 1, 1998; 1995, No. 182 (Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. May 22, 1996;

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2009, No. 33

, § 58;

2019, No. 70

, § 9.

§ 22a.
Use of gross operating revenues tax.

Expenses incurred by the Department for the support of activities relating to wholesale and retail sales of electricity shall be paid from revenues received by the Department from such sales.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 272

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 23.
Public Service Reserve Fund.

There is hereby created a fund to be known as the Public Service Reserve Fund for the purpose of providing the financial means for the Public Utility Commission and the Department of Public Service to employ legal counsel, official stenographers, and disinterested competent persons to examine into and testify in any matter involved in a hearing under sections 218, 225, 226, and 227 of this title other than the hearings referred to in sections 20 and 21 of this title. Payments into the Public Service Reserve Fund shall be made as follows: All electric distribution companies, cooperative, municipal, and privately owned, which have been allocated a share of St. Lawrence power by the Department, shall pay into the State Treasury for such reserve on or before September 15, 1961 and September 15, 1962, in addition to the taxes now required by law to be paid, a tax to produce a total of $37,500.00 in the aggregate for each such payment to be paid by each such company in proportion to its purchase of St. Lawrence power, during the calendar years 1959 and 1960. Thereafter, on June 30 of each year, there shall be deducted from the balance in the special fund for the maintenance of the Department’s engineering and accounting force and personnel employed by the Commission the tax revenues payable under section 22 of this title in that year, and the balance thus determined shall be transferred from the special fund for the maintenance of the engineering and accounting force to the Public Service Reserve Fund; provided, however, that, if at June 30 of any year the balance in such public service reserve fund shall be in excess of $100,000.00, the amount of such excess shall forthwith be transferred to the General Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

1961, No. 258

, § 2, eff. July 31, 1961; amended

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. Feb. 1, 1981.

§ 24.
Payments from special funds; biennial report.

All payments from the special fund for the maintenance of the engineering and accounting forces and from the Public Service Reserve Fund shall be dispensed from the State Treasury only upon warrants issued by the Commissioner of Finance and Management after receipt of proper statements describing services rendered and expenses incurred. A complete, detailed, and full accounting of all receipts from the taxes assessed in sections 22 and 23 of this title and all disbursements from the special fund for the maintenance of the engineering and accounting forces and from the Public Service Reserve Fund shall be contained in the Department’s biennial report to the General Assembly. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1961, No. 258

, § 2, eff. July 31, 1961; amended

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. May 14, 2012.

§ 25.
Assessment.

When the Department of Public Service discovers from the examination of the return or otherwise that the revenue of any company, or any portion thereof, has not been assessed, it may at any time within two years after the time when the return was due, assess the same and give notice to the company of such assessment, and within 30 days such company shall thereupon have an opportunity to confer with the Department as to the proposed assessment.
The limitation of two years to the assessment of such tax or additional tax shall not apply to the assessment of additional taxes upon fraudulent returns.
After the expiration of 30 days from such notification, the Department shall reassess the revenue of such company or any portion thereof which it finds has not theretofore been assessed and shall give notice to the company so reassessed, of the amount of the tax and interest and penalties, if any, and the amount thereof shall be due and payable within 10 days from the date of such notice.
No additional tax amounting to less than $1.00 shall be assessed.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Feb. 1, 1981.

§ 26.
Penalty.

When such annual report for any year is not rendered to the Department of Public Service and the tax due thereon is not paid on or before April 15 next following, there shall be added to the tax an additional amount equal to five percent thereof or
$1.00, whichever is greater, if such return is made and tax paid within 15 days after becoming due, and 25 percent of the tax or $10.00, whichever is greater, if such return is not made and tax paid within 15 days after becoming due.
When a company, which has failed to file such return or has filed an incorrect or insufficient return and has been notified by the Department of its delinquency refuses or neglects within 20 days after such notice to file a proper return, or files a fraudulent return, the Department shall determine the tax due according to its best information and belief and shall increase the amount of the tax so determined by 50 percent or $20.00, whichever is greater.
No assessment shall be made under this section unless made within two years from the date on which a correct return should have been filed but the limitation of two years to the assessment of such tax or additional tax shall not apply to the assessment of additional taxes upon fraudulent returns.
In its discretion, the Department may waive the penalties mentioned in this section if it is satisfied that the default was for any justifiable cause, and it may extend the time for filing returns or paying such tax, not to exceed two months.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Feb. 1, 1981.

§ 27.
Review.

The assessment by the Commission or Department of Public Service of any tax or penalty under the provisions of sections 20-25 of this title may be appealed to the Washington Superior Court. The appeal shall be filed within 90 days after the receipt by the company or its agent of written notice by the Commission or Department of its assessment. Thereupon, appropriate proceedings shall be had and the relief, if any, to which the company may be found entitled may be granted and any taxes, interest, or penalties paid, found by the Court to be illegally assessed, shall be ordered refunded to the company with interest at six percent per annum from the time of payment, with costs, and judgment entered accordingly.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1997, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. Jan. 1, 1998.

§ 28.
Hearings.

For the purpose of ascertaining the correctness of any return or for the purpose of making an estimate of the taxes due from any company, the Department of Public Service shall have power to examine or cause to be examined by any agent or representative designated by it for that purpose any books, papers, records, or memoranda of the company or of any person or corporation in the State bearing upon the matters required to be included in the return, and may require the attendance of any person having knowledge in the premises, at any place in the county where such person resides, and may take testimony and require proof material for its information, with power to administer an oath to such person.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. Feb. 1, 1981.

§ 29.
Right of inspection.

The Public Utility Commission or the Commissioner of Public Service, the Directors for Public Advocacy and Regulated Utility Planning, and other employees of the Department authorized by the Commissioner may, during business hours, enter the offices, plants, exchanges, and stations or upon the land or lines of any company subject to supervision by the Department.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. Feb. 1, 1981.